Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF523.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; HISTORIC SCHOOL BUILDING PRESERVATION GRANTS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education for the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Historic school building preservation grants. new text end new text begin (a) For grants to school districts and the Minnesota State Academies for the Deaf and the Blind for historic school building preservation: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) To be eligible for a grant under this subdivision, a school district or the Minnesota State Academies for the Deaf and the Blind must apply for a historic school building preservation grant in the form and manner determined by the commissioner. A grant recipient is eligible for up to $300,000 per eligible building. For purposes of this subdivision, "eligible building" means a building that is: new text end new text begin (1) currently serving elementary or secondary students; and new text end new text begin (2) listed on the National Register of Historic Places. new text end new text begin A grant recipient must use funds received under this subdivision to properly maintain and prevent deterioration of the eligible building. new text end new text begin (c) Any balance in the first year does not cancel but is available in the second year. new text end new text begin (d) The base for fiscal year 2028 and later is $........ new text end